Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.205

Washington college grant program—Financial need.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5785-S.SL) ***

In addition to other eligibility requirements outlined in this chapter, students who demonstrate financial need are eligible to receive the Washington college grant. Financial need is as follows:

(1) Until academic year 2020-21, students with family incomes between zero and fifty percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. Grants for students with incomes between fifty-one and seventy percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:

(a) Seventy percent for students with family incomes between fifty-one and fifty-five percent of the state median family income;

(b) Sixty-five percent for students with family incomes between fifty-six and sixty percent of the state median family income;

(c) Sixty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-one and sixty-five percent of the state median family income; and

(d) Fifty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-six and seventy percent of the state median family income.

(2) Beginning with academic year 2020-21, except during the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years, students with family incomes between zero and fifty-five percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. During the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years, students with family incomes between zero and sixty percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant. Grants for students with incomes between fifty-six and one hundred percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:

(a) Seventy percent for students with family incomes between fifty-six and sixty percent of the state median family income, except during the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years;

(b) Sixty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-one and sixty-five percent of the state median family income, except during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 academic years when student grant award shall not be prorated and students shall receive the maximum award;

(c) Fifty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-six and seventy percent of the state median family income;

(d) Twenty-four and one-half percent for students with family incomes between seventy-one and seventy-five percent of the state median family income; and

(e) Ten percent for students with family incomes between seventy-six and one hundred percent of the state median family income.

[ 2023 c 475 s 923; 2022 c 297 s 949; 2019 c 406 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 475: See note following RCW 16.76.030.

Effective date—2022 c 297: See note following RCW 43.79.565.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.